Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Land Use Board of Appeals,  for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,083,485.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $34,981
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Land Use Board of  Ap-
peals.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House May 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5028 (HB 5028-A) Page 1